Utah statutes.
20A-7-206.5.   Financial disclosure -- Paid circulators.

(1)  When the proponents of a proposed initiative have paid persons to circulate the petition, the proponents shall, at the time the last initiative packet is filed with the county clerk, file a form with the lieutenant governor detailing the amount of money paid per signature.

(2)  The lieutenant governor shall develop a form to disclose the information required by this section.

